Maryland, session 2025, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ATHLETIC ACTIVITY” INCLUDES INTERSCHOLASTIC
ATHLETICS:
(1) IN WHICH A STUDENT MAY PARTICIPATE OUTSIDE OF REGULAR
SCHOOL HOURS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1185*

HOUSE BILL 1185
(2) FOR WHICH A STUDENT DOES NOT EARN ACADEMIC CREDIT.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL
MAY ALLOW A STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL TO PARTICIPATE IN
AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY THE SCHOOL TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT A
STUDENT WHO IS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY IF THE STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED PARTICIPATES IN A HOME
INSTRUCTION PROGRAM PER COMAR GUIDELINES.
(C) A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SHALL GIVE PLACEMENT PRIORITY TO A
STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SPONSORING THE
EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY OVER A STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE
PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IF THERE ARE A LIMITED NUMBER OF SPACES AVAILABLE FOR
STUDENTS IN THE EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.